Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202586-1059
Wireless service, defined.

Wireless service means: (1) Any mobile service as defined in 47 U.S.C. 153 and 47 C.F.R. 27.4, as such section and regulation existed on January 1, 2025; (2) any commercial mobile service as defined in 47 U.S.C. 332(d), as such section existed on January 1, 2025; or (3) any commercial mobile radio service as referenced in 47 C.F.R. 20.3, as such regulation existed on January 1, 2025.

Laws 2007, LB661, § 22;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 86-456.01;

Laws 2025, LB362, § 41.